Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2169YH (4) 91 lh/ko H.F. 663 DIVISION I 1 IOWA FAMILY PLANNING NETWORK ââ MEDICAID STATE PLAN AMENDMENT 2 Section 1. IOWA FAMILY PLANNING NETWORK ââ MEDICAID STATE 3 PLAN AMENDMENT. The department of health and human services 4 shall submit a Medicaid state plan amendment to the centers for 5 Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department 6 of health and human services for approval to establish the Iowa 7 family planning network with the same benefits, eligibility 8 requirements, and other provisions included in the Medicaid 9 Iowa family planning network waiver as approved by the centers 10 for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States 11 department of health and human services in effect on June 30, 12 2017. 13 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 14 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 15 DIVISION II 16 REPEAL OF STATE FAMILY PLANNING SERVICES PROGRAM 17 Sec. 3. REPEAL. Section 217.41B, Code 2025, is repealed. 18 Sec. 4. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 19 effect upon receipt of approval by the department of health 20 and human services from the centers for Medicare and Medicaid 21 services of the United States department of health and human 22 services of the Medicaid state plan amendment submitted 23 pursuant to division I of this Act to establish the Iowa family 24 planning network: 25 The section of this division of this Act repealing section 26 217.41B, Code 2025. 27